Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 8

Ironworks

62-8-101. Benefiting statutes continued.

All statutes for the benefit of ironworks or the persons owning ironworks remain unless changed, altered or affected by the express provisions of this chapter.

Code 1858, § 1932; Shan., § 3461; mod. Code 1932, § 6535; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-801.

62-8-102. Obstruction of private roads.

Any person obstructing the roads necessarily used by the owners of ironworks for the purpose of hauling coal, ore, wood, metal or other material is liable in the same manner the person would be for obstructing the public roads of the state.

Code 1858, § 1934 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 4, § 6); Shan., § 3463; Code 1932, § 6536; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-802.

62-8-103. Taxation of lands.

All lands granted by this state to individuals and corporations for the encouragement of the building of ironworks are liable and subject to taxation as other lands.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 30, § 1; Shan., § 3464; Code 1932, § 6537; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-803.